Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-19,168
Court-ordered inspection.

(a) If a corporation does not allow a member who complies with subsection (a) of section 21-19,166 to inspect and copy any records required by that subsection to be available for inspection, the district court in the county where the corporation's principal office (or, if none in this state, its registered office) is located may summarily order inspection and copying of the records demanded at the corporation's expense upon application of the member.

(b) If a corporation does not within a reasonable time allow a member to inspect and copy any other record, the member who complies with subsections (b) and (c) of section 21-19,166 may apply to the district court in the county where the corporation's principal office (or, if none in this state, its registered office) is located for an order to permit inspection and copying of the records demanded. The district court shall dispose of an application under this subsection on an expedited basis.

(c) If the district court orders inspection and copying of the records demanded, it shall also order the corporation to pay the member's costs (including reasonable counsel fees) incurred to obtain the order unless the corporation proves that it refused inspection in good faith because it had a reasonable basis for doubt about the right of the member to inspect the records demanded.

(d) If the district court orders inspection and copying of the records demanded, it may impose reasonable restrictions on the use or distribution of the records by the demanding member.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 168.